District of Columbia statutes.
31-3524

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 25, 44 DCR 1158
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-369, § 2(j), 56 DCR 1346
1981 Ed., § 35-4724.
D.C. Law 17-369 substituted “shall” for “may”.